Wyoming, session 2025, HB0299.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-24-101(a)(x) and 9-24-102(b)(i)(F)
are amended to read:

9-24-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

HB0299

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0666
(x) "Qualified gaming entity" means any of the
following:

(A) A gaming entity that offers online
sports wagering through computers, digital platforms or
mobile applications in not less than three (3)
jurisdictions in the United States pursuant to a state
regulatory structure;

(B) The Northern Arapaho tribe of the Wind
River Reservation;

(C) The Eastern Shoshone tribe of the Wind
River Reservation.

9-24-102. Online sports wagering regulation;
rulemaking.

(b) The commission shall promulgate rules to
implement this chapter. The rules the commission
promulgates shall establish standards and procedures for
online sports wagering and associated sports wagering
systems. The rules shall include:
HB0299

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0666

(i) Governance of the conduct of online sports
wagering and the system of wagering associated with online
sports wagering, including all of the following:

(F) A requirement for each sports wagering
operator to use a geolocation system to ensure that all of
the following:

(I) A patron making an online sports
wager is physically present in the state when making the
wager unless otherwise authorized by the commission;

(II) No online sports wager is
accepted from a patron who is physically present on the
lands of the Northern Arapaho tribe of the Wind River
Reservation or the Eastern Shoshone tribe of the Wind River
Reservation. This subdivision shall not apply to online
sports wagering conducted by the Northern Arapaho tribe and
the Eastern Shoshone tribe.

HB0299

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0666
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0299